Hawaii statutes.
§373-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Actual earnings from employment"
means the total compensation, including reported amount of tips for labor or
services rendered by an employee, whether the amount is determined on a time,
task, piece, commission, or other basis of calculation, but shall not include
the reasonable cost to an employer of furnishing an employee with fringe
benefits or board, lodging, or other facilities and non-cash gratuities of any
kind.

"Applicant" means any person who uses
the services of an employment agency to secure employment for that person.

"Branch office" means an employment
agency office maintained away from the principal employment agency office.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Employer" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, or association, employing or seeking to employ any
person for hire.

"Employment agency" means any
individual, partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the business of
providing employment information, procuring employment for applicants, or
procuring employees for placement with employers upon request, for a fee or
other valuable thing, exacted, charged, or received, but shall not include the
United States or the State or instrumentalities thereof.

"Gross wages, salaries, or
commissions" means the gross amount of the applicant's actual earnings
from employment.

"Principal agent" means the
responsible managing agent who is responsible for managing an employment agency
and who is responsible for all business transactions and actions by the
agency's employees. [L 1959, c 264, pt of §3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; Supp,
§88A-1; HRS §373-1; am L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; am L 1983, c 84, §1(2); am L
1985, c 135, §1; am L 2002, c 22, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next